Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.035

Policies on secondary school access and egress.

School district boards of directors shall review school district policies regarding access and egress by students from secondary school grounds during school hours. Each school district board of directors shall adopt a policy specifying any restrictions on students leaving secondary school grounds during school hours.

[ 1995 c 312 s 82.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 312 ss 71 and 82: See note following RCW 28A.225.095.

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.